Utah statutes.
75-2a-113.   Personal representative status.
A surrogate becomes a personal representative for an adult under the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 when:
(1)  the adult has been found to lack health care decision making capacity
under Section 75-2a-104;
(2)  the adult grants current authority to the surrogate either:
(a)  in writing; or
(b)  by other expression before a witness who is not the surrogate or agent;
or
(3)  the court appoints a guardian authorized to make health care decisions on
behalf of the adult.
